District of Columbia statutes.
31-3612

Penalties.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, if, after a judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding conducted in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, an insurer or any agent is found to have violated any requirements of this chapter, that insurer or agent shall be subject to a fine of up to 3 times the amount of any commissions paid for each policy involved in the violation or up to $10,000, whichever is greater.

History

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 13, 47 DCR 2038